Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1056.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6129. Gun violence task forces.(a) Establishment.--(1) Upon written request initiated by the district attorney of a county to the Attorney General, a gun violence task force may be established in the county.(2) The district attorney may terminate the gun violence task force by providing written notice to the Attorney General. Absent notice under this paragraph, the gun violence task force shall terminate as otherwise provided in this section.(3) A gun violence task force shall operate under the 123456789101112131415161718 authority of the Attorney General.(b) Powers and duties.--A gun violence task force:(1) Shall investigate violations of sections 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms) and 6111 (relating to sale or transfer of firearms), and similar offenses under Federal law, in the county in which the task force is established.(2) M ay recommend to the Attorney General to prosecute violations under paragraph (1) . (3) May utilize investigatory teams impaneled under subsection (d).(c) Composition.--A gun violence task force may, as determined by the Attorney General, include:(1) The Attorney General, deputy attorneys general and agents of the Office of the Attorney General.(2) Members of the office of the district attorney in a county.(3) Federal, State and local law enforcement officers.(4) Representatives of key stakeholders in communities that are experiencing high and increasing rates of gun violence.(5) Faith leaders who work with communities experiencing high rates of gun violence.(6) A community relations officer who represents a community experiencing high rates of gun violence.(7) A victim of crime who works in neighborhoods experiencing high rates of gun violence.(8) An expert in preventive crime measures who has advised on crime-reduction techniques.20250SB1056PN1248 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Investigatory teams.-- In a county where a gun violence task force has been established, the Attorney General may impanel individualized investigatory teams that work in conjunction with and under the purview of a gun violence task force . (e) Notice.--Each law enforcement agency that is a member of a gun violence task force shall notify the gun violence task force of any arrest or other criminal action or proceeding for violations under subsection (b)(1) within 48 hours of the arrest or of instituting the action or proceeding.(f) Authority to prosecute for certain offenses.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), in a county in which a gun violence task force has been established under this section, the Attorney General may prosecute any criminal action or proceeding, including a proceeding for the forfeiture or condemnation of property under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 58 (relating to forfeiture of assets), for violations under subsection (b)(1).(2) In deciding whether to prosecute under this subsection, the Attorney General shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including:(i) Whether the alleged violation of section 6105 or 6111 is the lead charge and the severity of any other offense charged in conjunction with the alleged violation of section 6105 or 6111.(ii) The criminal history record information of the alleged offender, including whether the offender was previously convicted of an offense under this chapter.(iii) Whether a gun violence task force recommended prosecution under subsection (b)(2).20250SB1056PN1248 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Whether the Attorney General has sufficient resources to prosecute the alleged offender.(v) Whether the alleged offender utilized a firearm during the commission of a felony.(vi) Whether the alleged offender is involved or associated with the sale, manufacture, distribution or delivery of any controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance in violation of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(vii) The impact of the alleged offense on the victim or the community.(viii) Whether the alleged offender's commission of the offense violated the terms and conditions of a sentence or bail bond.(ix) Any other relevant or aggravating circumstances.(3) The Attorney General may not prosecute under this section if the alleged offender unlawfully possessed a firearm during the commission of murder or a crime of violence, as that term is defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses), unless the district attorney requests in writing that the Attorney General prosecute the case.(4) In a case in which the Attorney General exercises the authority to prosecute under this section , no other prosecuting entity for the Commonwealth shall have authority to act, except as authorized by the Attorney General. No person shall have standing to challenge the authority of the Attorney General to prosecute the cases, and, if any 20250SB1056PN1248 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 challenge is made, the challenge shall be dismissed and no relief shall be available in the courts of this Commonwealth to the prosecuting entity making the challenge.(5) The provisions of this subsection shall expire December 31, 2027.(g) Annual reports.--(1) By October 1 of each year, the Attorney General shall make an annual report on the operation of gun violence task forces to: (i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives.(2) The report under this subsection shall contain the following information for the previous fiscal year regarding each gun violence task force : (i) The number of members, per agency, serving on the gun violence task force . (ii) The total number of arrests in a county for alleged violations of section 6105 or 6111, including separately the total number of arrests by the gun violence task force . (iii) The total number of bills of information filed for alleged violations of section 6105 or 6111, including separately the total number of bills filed by the Attorney General under this section . 20250SB1056PN1248 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) The total number of convictions resulting from prosecutions under subparagraph (iii), including separately the total number of convictions resulting from prosecutions by the Attorney General under this section . (v) The sentences imposed for each conviction under subparagraph (iv), including separately the sentences imposed for each conviction resulting from a prosecution by the Attorney General under this section . (vi) The number of firearms seized by the gun violence task force . (vii) A summary of expenditures, including any money appropriated for the gun violence task force in a previous year that is carried over or unspent.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB1056PN1248 - 6 - 1234567891011121314